fr: Quincaillerie > Accessoires de quincaillerie > Matériel pour meubles de cuisine: Entrées de serrure pour armoires et autres meubles; Plaques pour poignées de meubles de cuisine; Crochets de portes pour meubles de cuisine; Portes pour meubles de cuisine; Poignées et boutons de portes pour meubles de cuisine
th: ฮาร์ดแวร์ > อุปกรณ์ฮาร์ดแวร์ > ฮาร์ดแวร์ของตู้: แผ่นโลหะรอบลูกกุญแจของตู้และเฟอร์นิเจอร์; แผ่นหลังประตูตู้; ที่กั้นประตูตู้; ประตูตู้; ลูกบิดและที่จับตู้
sv: Metallprodukter > Tillbehör till järnvaror > Skåpbeslag: Nyckelhålsbeslag för skåp och möbler; Bakplattor för skåphandtag; Spärranordningar för skåpdörrar; Skåpdörrar; Skåphandtag
el: Υλικά κατασκευών > Αξεσουάρ υλικού > Υλικό ντουλαπιού: Εξωτερικές πλάκες κλειδαριάς με κλειδαρότρυπα για ντουλάπια & έπιπλα; Πλάκες στο πίσω μέρος ντουλαπιών; Κλειδώματα ντουλαπιών; Πόρτες ντουλαπιών; Πόμολα & χερούλια ντουλάπας
nb: Maskinvare > Tilbehør til materiell > Maskinvare til skap: Nøkkelplater til skap og møbler; Bakplater til skap; Skaphengsler; Skapdører; Skapknotter og -håndtak
da: Isenkram > Isenkram – tilbehør > Skabstilbehør: Nøglehulsbeslag til skabe og møbler; Skabsbagplader; Skabsstoppere; Skabsdøre; Skabslågegreb og -håndtag
ro-RO: Feronerie > Accesorii de feronerie > Elemente de feronerie pentru dulapuri: Șilduri pentru dulapuri și mobilier; Plăci spate pentru dulapuri; Clicheți pentru dulapuri; Uși pentru dulapuri; Clanțe și mânere pentru dulapuri
pt-BR: Ferragens > Acessórios para ferragens > Ferragens para armários embutidos: Fechaduras decorativas para armários e móveis; Puxadores de armários embutidos; Ferrolhos de armários embutidos; Portas de armários embutidos; Maçanetas e alças para armários embutidos
ko: 철물 > 철물 부대용품 > 수납장용 철물: 수납장/가구 열쇠구멍 장식쇠; 수납장 백플레이트; 수납장 도어캐치; 수납장 문; 수납장 손잡이/핸들
pt-PT: Equipamento > Acessórios de equipamento > Equipamento de armário: Espelhos de fechadura de mobiliário e armários; Placas traseiras de armário; Trincos de armário; Portas de armário; Pegas e puxadores de armário
de: Heimwerkerbedarf > Bauzubehör > Schrankbauteile: Schlüssellochverzierungen für Schränke; Schrankbeschläge; Schrankscharniere; Schranktüren; Schrankknäufe & -griffe
it: Articoli di ferramenta > Accessori ferramenta > Articoli per mobiletti: Bocchette per serrature di armadietti e mobili; Piastre posteriori mobiletti; Cerniere per mobili; Ante per mobiletti; Pomelli/maniglie mobiletti
fi: Rakentaminen > Tarvikkeet > Kaapiston tarvikkeet: Kaappien ja kalusteiden avaimenreiän suojakilvet; Kaappien takalevyt; Kaapinsulkimet; Kaapinovet; Kaapin vetimet ja kahvat
vi: Phần cứng > Phụ kiện phần cứng > Tủ: Nắp lỗ khóa tủ có ngăn kéo và đồ nội thất; Ốp hậu tủ; Cái chốt tủ; Cửa tủ; Tay nắm tủ
pl: Sprzęt > Akcesoria do sprzętu > Wyposażenie do szaf: Szyldy do zamków w szafkach; Szyldy do szaf; Zatrzaski do szaf; Drzwi do szaf; Gałki i uchwyty do szaf
en: Hardware > Hardware Accessories > Cabinet Hardware: Cabinet & Furniture Keyhole Escutcheons; Cabinet Backplates; Cabinet Catches; Cabinet Doors; Cabinet Knobs & Handles
lt-LT: Techninė įranga > Techninės įrangos priedai > Spintelių furnitūra: Spintelių ir baldų rakto skylutės dangteliai; Spintelių galinės plokštės; Spintelių durelių fiksatoriai; Spintelių durelės; Spintelių rankenėlės ir rankenos
hu: Hardver > Hardverkiegészítők > Szekrényhardver: Szekrény- és bútorkulcslyuk-védőlemezek; Szekrényhátlapok; Szekrényfogók; Szekrényajtók; Szekrénykilincsek és fogantyúk
ru: Оборудование и технические изделия > Аксессуары для оборудования и технических изделий > Фурнитура для шкафов: Ключевины для мебели; Декоративные накладки для шкафов; Защелки для шкафов; Дверцы для шкафов; Ручки для шкафов
bg-BG: Железария > Обков и аксесоари > Обков за шкафове: Розетки за ключалки на шкафове и мебели; Декоративни розетки за дръжки на шкаф; Шнапери за шкаф; Врати за шкафове; Дръжки за шкафове
zh-CN: 五金/硬件 > 五金配件 > 橱柜金属器件: 橱柜/家具锁眼盖; 橱柜拉手; 柜门吸; 柜门; 橱柜拉手/把手
cs: Kutilství a řemeslo > Kutilství a řemeslo – příslušenství > Nábytkové kování: Ozdobné štítky klíčových dírek na skřínky a nábytek; Nábytkové podložky kování; Nábytkové západky; Nábytková dvířka; Nábytkové úchytky a madla
es: Bricolaje > Accesorios de bricolaje > Ferretería para armarios: Escudos para cerraduras de armarios y muebles; Placas soporte para tiradores de armarios; Cierres de armarios; Puertas de armarios; Pomos y picaportes de armarios
ja: DIY用品 > DIY小物類 > キャビネット用品・取付金具: キャビネット・家具用鍵穴装飾プレート; キャビネット取付用バックプレート; キャビネットキャッチ; キャビネット扉; キャビネット取っ手
hr-HR: Željezarija > Metalni dodaci > Metalne komponente za ormariće: Zaštitne pločice za ključanice za ormare i namještaj; Stražnje ploče za ormariće; Zatvarači za ormariće; Vrata ormarića; Kvake i ručke za ormariće
sl-SI: Gradbena oprema > Dodatki za gradbeno opremo > Okovja za omarice: Pokrovčki za vratne ključavnice za omarice in pohištvo; Hrbtne plošče za omarice; Spone za omarice; Vrata za omarice; Kljuke in ročaji za omarice
zh-TW: 硬體 > 硬體配件 > 櫥櫃五金配件: 櫥櫃和家具鑰匙孔護罩; 櫥櫃背板; 櫥櫃門閂; 櫥櫃門; 櫥櫃握把
tr: Hırdavat > Tesisat Aksesuarları > Dolap Hırdavatları: Dolap ve Mobilya Anahtar Deliği Kapakları; Dolap Arka Levhaları; Dolap Kapak Mandalları; Dolap Kapakları; Dolap Kulp ve Tutamakları
sk-SK: Náradie > Príslušenstvo ku kovaniu > Kovanie skriniek: Kovania kľúčových dierok na skrinkách a nábytku; Zadné dosky skriniek; Úchyty skriniek; Dvierka skriniek; Skrinkové kľučky a rukoväte
nl: Bouwmaterialen > Bouwbeslag > Beslag voor kastjes: Sleutelgatplaatjes voor kasten en meubels; Achterwanden voor kastjes; Kastgrepen; Kastdeuren; Kastknoppen en kastgrepen